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DTC P 1600/96ECMBATTMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Battery positive voltage is supplied to terminal BATT of the engine ECU even when the ignition switch is OFF
foruseby theDTCmemoryandair −fuel ratioadaptivecontrol valuememory,etc.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1600/96 Open inbackuppowersourcecircuit
SOpen inbackuppowersourcecircuit
SEngineECU

HINT:
If DTC P1600/96 appear, the engine ECU does not store another DTC.

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because free framerecords theengineconditionswhen
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ningorstopped, theenginewaswarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,etc.at the timeof the
malfunction.
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1 Check voltage between terminal BATT of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove the engine room ECU cover.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal BATT of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

2 Check EFI fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI fuse from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity of EFI fuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short in all harness and components
connected to EFI fuse.

OK

Check and repair harness or connector be-
tween battery, EFI fuse and engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


